Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1708
Vacancy; legal process; deputy; duty.

In case of a vacancy occurring in the office of sheriff from any cause the deputy or deputies shall be under obligation to execute legal process until the vacancy is filled.

Laws 1879, § 123, p. 385;

R.S.1913, § 5660;

C.S.1922, § 4987;

C.S.1929, § 26-1408;

R.S.1943, § 23-1708;

Laws 1990, LB 872, § 1.

Sheriff may complete execution of order of sale regularly issued to him during his term, after expiration of his term. National Black River Bank v. Wall, 3 Neb. Unof. 316, 91 N.W. 525 (1902).